New York, session 2025-2026, S1113.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 679-k 2 to read as follows: 3 § 679-k. New York state social worker loan forgiveness incentive 4 program. 1. Purpose. The president shall grant student loan forgiveness 5 awards for the purpose of alleviating the burden of student loan debt 6 for social workers in New York state. Such awards shall be made on a 7 competitive basis as promulgated by the corporation for such purposes, 8 to applicants who meet the eligibility criteria. Such rules and regu- 9 lations shall include provisions for the consideration of applicants who 10 are economically disadvantaged. 11 2. Eligibility. To be eligible for an award pursuant to this section, 12 applicants shall: 13 (a) have graduated and obtained a degree from an approved New York 14 state college or university; 15 (b) have an outstanding student loan debt from obtaining such degree; 16 (c) be employed as a licensed master social worker or licensed clin- 17 ical social worker in New York state in accordance with article one 18 hundred fifty-four of this chapter; 19 (d) apply for this program within two years of college graduation; 20 (e) comply with subdivisions three and five of section six hundred 21 sixty-one of this part; and 22 (f) make a commitment to practice in a county with less than two 23 hundred thousand population, or any town which has a population of less EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03637-01-5 S. 1113 2 1 than one hundred fifty persons per square mile for the duration of the 2 award. 3 3. Awards. The corporation shall grant such awards within amounts 4 appropriated for such purposes and based on the availability of funds. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law.